Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3805
Kratom product; sale, offer for sale, or introduce into commerce; requirements.

A kratom product sold, offered for sale, or introduced into commerce in the State of Nebraska shall:

(1) Be manufactured, packaged, labeled, or held in a facility that meets the requirements of 21 C.F.R. part 111, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2025; and

(2) Be manufactured, processed, packed, or held by a processor who has registered with the federal Food and Drug Administration as a food facility.

Laws 2025, LB230, § 5.